Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Administrative Code. —

For general provisions: definitions, see 2 AAC 12, art. 18.

Sec. 36.30.850.
Application of this chapter.

This chapter applies only to contracts solicited or entered into after January 1, 1988, unless the parties agree to its application to a contract solicited or entered into before that date.

This chapter applies to every expenditure of state money by the state, acting through an agency, under a contract, except that this chapter does not apply to

grants;

contracts for professional witnesses to provide for professional services or testimony relating to

existing or probable lawsuits in which the state is or may become a party; or

litigation in which the Public Defender Agency or the office of public advocacy has been appointed to represent a person;

contracts of the University of Alaska where the work is to be performed substantially by students enrolled in the university;

contracts for medical doctors and dentists;

acquisitions or disposals of real property or interest in real property, except as provided in AS

36.30.080

and

36.30.085

;

disposals under AS 38.05;

contracts for the transportation of ballots under AS 15;

acquisitions or disposals of property and other contracts relating to airports under AS

02.15.070

,

02.15.090

,

02.15.091

, and AS 44.88;

disposals of obsolete property under AS

19.05.060

;

disposals of obsolete material or equipment under AS

35.20.060

;

agreements with providers of services under AS

47.25.071

—

47.25.095

; AS 47.07; AS 47.08; AS 47.10; AS 47.12; AS 47.14; AS 47.17; AS 47.24; and AS 47.27, including contractors under AS

47.27.050

;

contracts of the Department of Fish and Game for flights that involve specialized flying and piloting skills and are not point-to-point;

purchases of income-producing assets for the state treasury or a public corporation of the state;

a contract that is a delegation, in whole or in part, of investment powers held by

the commissioner of revenue under AS

14.42.200

,

14.42.210

, AS

18.56.095

, AS

37.10.070

,

37.10.071

, or AS 37.14;

the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.250

—

14.40.491

;

a contract that is a delegation, in whole or in part, of investment powers or fiduciary duties of

the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation under AS 37.13;

the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority under AS

37.14.001

—

37.14.099

;

the purchase of books, book binding services, newspapers, periodicals, audio-visual materials, network information services access, approval plans, professional memberships, archival materials, objects of art, and items for museum or archival acquisition having cultural, historical, or archaeological significance; in this paragraph

“approval plans” means book selection services in which current book titles meeting an agency’s customized specifications are provided to the agency subject to the right of the agency to return those books that do not meet with the agency’s approval;

“archival materials” means the noncurrent records of an agency that are preserved after appraisal because of their value;

“audio-visual materials” means nonbook prerecorded materials, including records, tapes, slides, transparencies, films, filmstrips, cassettes, videos, compact discs, laser discs, and items that require the use of equipment to render them usable;

“network information services” means a group of resources from which cataloging information, holdings records, inter-library loans, acquisitions information, and other reference resources can be obtained;

contracts for the purchase of standardized examinations for licensure under AS 08;

contracts for home health care provided under regulations adopted by the Department of Health and Social Services and for adult residential care services provided under regulations adopted by the Department of Health and Social Services or by the Department of Administration;

contracts for supplies or services for research projects funded by money received from the federal government or private grants;

guest speakers or performers for an educational or cultural activity;

contracts of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority for a clean coal technology demonstration project that

is attempting to develop a coal-fired electric generation project;

uses technology that is capable of commercialization during the 1990’s; and

qualifies for federal financial participation under P.L. 99-190 as amended;

operation and protection of assets or disposals of equipment and supplies acquired through foreclosure or other legal proceedings relating to loans issued under AS 03.10;

purchases of curatorial and conservation services to maintain, preserve, and interpret

objects of art; and

items having cultural, historical, or archaeological significance to the state;

acquisition of confidential seismic survey data necessary for pre-sale oil and gas lease or gas only lease analyses under AS

38.05.180

;

contracts for village public safety officers;

purchases of supplies and services to support the operations of the Alaska state troopers or law enforcement officers engaged in fish and wildlife protection if the procurement officer for the Department of Public Safety makes a written determination that publicity of the purchases would jeopardize the safety of personnel or the success of a covert operation;

expenditures when rates are set by law or ordinance;

construction of new vessels by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the Alaska marine highway system;

contracts entered into with a regional development organization; in this paragraph, “regional development organization” means a nonprofit organization or nonprofit corporation formed to encourage economic development within a particular region of the state that includes the entire area of each municipality within that region and that has a board of directors that represents the region’s economic, political, and social interests;

contracts that are to be performed in an area outside of the country and that require a knowledge of the customs, procedures, rules, or laws of the area;

contracts that are between the

Department of Law and attorneys who are not employed by the state and that are for the review or prosecution of possible violations of the criminal law of the state in situations where the attorney general concludes that an actual or potential conflict of interest makes it inappropriate for the Department of Law to review or prosecute the possible violations; and

Public Defender Agency or the office of public advocacy and attorneys who are not employed by the state and that are for the review or defense of possible violations of the criminal law of the state in situations where the public defender or the director of the office of public advocacy concludes that an actual or potential conflict of interest makes it inappropriate for the Public Defender Agency or the office of public advocacy to review or defend the possible violations;

contracts between the Department of Natural Resources and contractors qualified to evaluate hydrocarbon development, production, transportation, and economics, to assist the commissioner of natural resources in evaluating applications for royalty increases or decreases or other royalty adjustments, and evaluating the related financial and technical data, entered into under AS

38.05.180

(j);

contracts of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority made with the developer of an integrated transportation and port facility owned by the authority;

procurements of contracts with the media for advertising;

contracts between the state medical examiner and a provider of medical services to perform or assist in performing the duties assigned to the state medical examiner in AS

12.65.020

;

contracts between the commissioner of revenue and an independent contractor under AS

43.82.240

;

contracts for a convener under AS

44.62.730

or for a facilitator under AS

44.62.760

related to a negotiated regulation making process under AS

44.62.710

—

44.62.800

;

grants and contracts with qualified entities for services under AS

47.18.330

for the foster care transition program;

contracts for travel services, including airplane travel, hotel accommodations, and travel agency services, but excluding motor vehicle rentals;

contracts of the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education or the Alaska Student Loan Corporation for the guarantee and disbursing of financial aid money to institutions of postsecondary education under the financial aid programs under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.750

and AS

14.44.025

;

contracts for an arbitration panel to determine whether a project is uneconomic under AS

43.90.240

, and contracts for the development of application provisions for licensure and for the evaluation of those applications under AS 43.90;

contracts for delivery of home heating assistance under AS

47.25.626

;

contracts of the Alaska Pension Obligation Bond Corporation under AS

37.16.010

—

37.16.900

;

the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation (AS 31.25) and subsidiaries of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation;

contracts for professional and technical services by the Department of Natural Resources to support the development of agreements and contracts under AS

38.05.020(b)(10)

and (11);

contracts of the Department of Law developed with client participation for legal services related to an Alaska liquefied natural gas project as that project is defined in AS

31.25.390

, except that, to the extent practicable, the Department of Law shall use the procurement process under AS

36.30.320

with the participation of the client;

contracts of the Department of Education and Early Development for student assessments required under AS

14.03.123

and AS

14.07.020

;

a contract under AS 06.65;

contracts of the Alaska Tax Credit Certificate Bond Corporation under AS 37.18;

overriding royalty interest agreements under AS

44.37.230

.

Except for AS

36.30.085

and

36.30.700

—

36.30.790

, this chapter does not apply to contracts between two or more agencies, the state and its political subdivisions, or the state and other governments.

Nothing in this chapter or in regulations adopted under this chapter prevents an agency or political subdivision from complying with the terms and conditions of a grant, gift, bequest, cooperative agreement, or federal assistance agreement.

[Renumbered as AS 36.30.170(i). For current law, see AS

36.30.321

.]

History.

(am ch 59 § 8 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 93 § 3 (1996); am E.O. No. 108 § 3 (2003); § 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 21, 22 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 102 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 9 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 134 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 37 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 1993; am §§ 8, 9 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1995; am § 16 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 1996; am §§ 42, 43, 48 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 9 SLA 1997; am § 37 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 104 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 7 ch 117 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 1999; am §§ 34, 35 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 89 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 2002; am § 53 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 7, 8 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 30 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 20 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 173 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2008; am § 7 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 37 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 7 SLA 2010; am §§ 4, 23 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 2013; am § 22 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 5 ch 76 SLA 2014; am §§ 3, 4 ch 79 SLA 2014; am § 21 ch 54 SLA 2016; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2003, “AS 47.12; AS 47.14; AS” was reinserted in (b)(11) of this section to correct an error in failing to reconcile chs. 59 and 107, SLA 1996.

In 2003, in paragraph (b)(11), “AS

47.25.071

—

47.25.095

” was substituted for “AS 47.25.007 — 47.25.009” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.007 — 47.25.009.

The paragraphs in subsection (b) were renumbered in 1988, 1993, 1996, 1998, 2002, 2008, 2012, 2014, and 2016 to account for multiple paragraphs enacted with the same paragraph number and repealed paragraphs.

Cross references. —

For provisions applicable to all insurance contracts involving state money, see AS

36.30.321

.

For applicability of the 2013 change to paragraph (b)(7), see sec. 2, ch. 58, SLA 2013.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, added (b)(47).

The second 2016 amendment, effective November 4, 2016, added (b)(47) [now (b)(48)].

The 2018 amendment, effective June 21, 2018, added (b)(49) and (50).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 33, SLA 2018 (HB 331), which added (b)(49) and (50), see 2018 House Journal 2341 — 2343.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The exception in paragraph (b)(1) for grants applies where: 1) the legislature makes an appropriation to a specific program for a specific purpose; 2) the appropriation is for a donative purpose that would more traditionally be characterized as a grant (rather than the purchase of services or supplies); and 3) the nature of the program, known to the legislature, makes application of the procurement code difficult or unreasonable.
Mar. 23, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The State Procurement Code does not apply to decisions of the Department of Fish and Game (DF&G) concerning allocation to private nonprofit hatcheries of federal funds granted to the state in connection with the U.S./Canada Pacific Salmon Treaty, since the transaction that occurs when DF&G selects and allocates federal grant money to private nonprofit hatchery projects is not contractual under the State Procurement Code.
Apr. 13, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities (DOT/PF) is not required to make the Procurement Code a condition of a Transfer of Responsibility Agreement (TORA). DOT/PF has discretion to negotiate for the inclusion of all or portions of the code in a TORA.
June 10, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Procurement Code does not apply to contract negotiations of the Alaska Marine Highway System (AMHS) with the Port of Bellingham to provide terminal services at Bellingham for the AMHS.
However, the AMHS may contract for these services with the Port of Bellingham.
Aug. 16, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Although the procurement code mentions the expenditure of money, the procurement code must be read to cover cases where instead of money some other type of valuable consideration is provided by the state in exchange for a good or service.
Apr. 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS

36.30.850(b)(16)

[now (b)(15)] does not exempt the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation from the procurement requirements of AS 36.30, when the corporation retains certain advisory, consulting, auditing, legal and investment services. Jan. 26, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

The State Procurement Code would not apply to services truly donated to construction effort by Upper Susitna Soil and Water Conservation District to assemble a building received as a donation to the District, and the Department of Natural Resources can provide supervision and oversight of the project without formal involvement of the Department of Transportaion and Public Facilities. Jan. 14, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Department of Fish and Game may comply with an express term or condition imposed by the Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Council that strictly requires a contract be awarded to a specific entity, but should not infer such an intent; if the Council fails to expressly impose the condition that a contract be awarded to a specific entity, the Department must comply with competitive requirements of the procurement code regarding the selection of the contract recepient, and the Department should comply with any other provision of the procurement code that does not conflict with an express term or condition the Council imposes. Sept. 14, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.860.
Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, 45.14, and 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code), the law merchant, and law relative to capacity to contract, agency, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, or bankruptcy shall supplement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 36.30.870.
Adoption of regulations.

Regulations under this chapter shall be adopted in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

Regulations under this chapter applicable to procurements of construction or procurements for or disposal of property of the state equipment fleet shall be adopted by the commissioner of administration only after consultation with the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

The commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations establishing the procedures for arbitration under AS

36.30.627(a)

, including establishing the qualifications for arbitrators and the method for appointing neutral arbitrators to conduct arbitrations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 144 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For construction arbitration procedures, see 2 AAC 12, art. 17.

Sec. 36.30.880.
Requirement of good faith.

All parties involved in the negotiation, performance, or administration of state contracts shall act in good faith.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.890.
Federal funds or assistance.

If a procurement involves the expenditure of federal funds or federal assistance and there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under a provision of this chapter and a federal statute, regulation, policy, or requirement, the federal statute, regulation, policy, or requirement shall prevail.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Department of Fish and Game may comply with an express term or condition imposed by the Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Council that strictly requires a contract be awarded to a specific entity, but should not infer such an intent; if the Council fails to expressly impose the condition that a contract be awarded to a specific entity, the Department must comply with competitive requirements of the procurement code regarding the selection of the contract recepient, and the Department should comply with any other provision of the procurement code that does not conflict with an express term or condition the Council imposes. Sept. 14, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.900.
Product preferences. [Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 36.30.910.
Purchases through general services administration.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, purchasing through the general services administration or from federal supply schedules of the general services administration may be made without competitive sealed bidding, competitive sealed proposals, or other competition, so long as the purchasing is from persons located in the state in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner for purchases under this section and as provided under 41 U.S.C. 251 — 266.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 44 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

41 U.S.C. 251 — 266, referred to in this section, have been renumbered.

Sec. 36.30.920.
Reporting of anticompetitive practices.

When for any reason collusion or other anticompetitive practices are suspected among bidders or offerors, a notice of the relevant facts shall be transmitted to the attorney general by the person who suspects the collusion or other anticompetitive practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For legal and contractual remedies, see 2 AAC 12, art. 13.

Sec. 36.30.930.
Civil and criminal penalties.

The following penalties apply to violations of this chapter:

a person who contracts for or purchases supplies, equipment for the state fleet, services, professional services, or construction in a manner the person knows to be contrary to the requirements of this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter is liable for all costs and damages to the state arising out of the violation;

a person who intentionally or knowingly contracts for or purchases supplies, equipment for the state fleet, services, professional services, or construction under a scheme or artifice to avoid the requirements of this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.940.
Enforcement.

The attorney general on behalf of the state shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.950.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or any application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared severable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.960.
Background investigation for contractors with access to federal tax information.

Upon request of an agency, the procurement officer shall notify each contractor if a contract with the state requires access to federal tax information for performance of the contract. Each contractor with the state whose duties require access to federal tax information shall submit to and pass a background investigation that includes a state and national criminal history record check. The contractor shall provide information for the background investigation, including fingerprints, in a format requested by the procurement officer or the contracting agency. The procurement officer or the contracting agency shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check. The Department of Public Safety may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.

A contractor shall pay to the procurement officer or contracting agency the fee established by AS

12.62.160

for the national criminal history record check.

A background investigation under this section, including a state and national criminal history record check, is confidential.

In this section, unless the context otherwise requires,

“agency” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

;

“contractor” means a person who has applied for or been awarded a contract with an agency and includes a subcontractor;

“federal tax information” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 25 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4,
ch. 25, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 25, SLA 2018 (HB 219), which added this section, see 2017 House Journal 895 — 897.

Sec. 36.30.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context in which a term is used clearly requires a different meaning or a different definition is prescribed for a particular provision,

“agency”

means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, the Alaska Pioneers’ Home, the Alaska Veterans’ Home, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government;

does not include

the University of Alaska;

the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

a regional Native housing authority created under AS

18.55.996

or a regional electrical authority created under AS

18.57.020

;

the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, in regard to the repair, maintenance, and reconstruction of vessels, docking facilities, and passenger and vehicle transfer facilities of the Alaska marine highway system;

the Alaska Aerospace Corporation;

the Alaska Retirement Management Board;

the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute;

the Alaska children’s trust and the Alaska Children’s Trust Board;

the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority;

“Alaska bidder” means a person who

holds a current Alaska business license;

submits a bid or proposal for goods, services, or construction under the name appearing on the person’s current Alaska business license;

has maintained a place of business in the state staffed by the bidder or offeror or an employee of the bidder or offeror for a period of six months immediately preceding the date of the bid or proposal;

is incorporated or qualified to do business under the laws of the state, is a sole proprietorship and the proprietor is a resident of the state, is a limited liability company organized under AS 10.50 and all members are residents of the state, or is a partnership under former AS 32.05, AS 32.06, or AS 32.11 and all partners are residents of the state; and

if a joint venture, is composed entirely of ventures that qualify under (A) — (D) of this paragraph;

“change order” means a written order signed by the procurement officer, directing the contractor to make changes that the changes clause of the contract authorizes the procurement officer to order without the consent of the contractor;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“competitive sealed bidding” means the procedure under AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.190

;

“competitive sealed proposals” means the procedure under AS

36.30.200

—

36.30.260

;

“construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, maintaining, improving, or demolishing a public highway, structure, building, or other public improvement of any kind to real property other than privately owned real property leased for the use of agencies; it includes services and professional services relating to planning and design required for the construction; it does not include the routine operation of a public improvement to real property nor does it include the construction of public housing;

“contract” means all types of state agreements, regardless of what they may be called, for the procurement or disposal of supplies, equipment for the state fleet, services, professional services, or construction;

“contract modification” means a written alteration in specifications, delivery point, rate of delivery, period of performance, price, quantity, or other provisions of a contract accomplished by mutual action of the parties to the contract;

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“design-build construction contract” means a contract to provide construction in accordance with a design provided by the contractor;

“employment program” means a nonprofit program to increase employment opportunities for individuals with physical or mental disabilities that constitute substantial barriers to employment;

“grant” means property furnished by the state, whether real or personal, designated by law, including an appropriation Act, as a grant;

“hearing” does not include a hearing in an arbitration;

“in writing” has the meaning given to “written” in this section;

“lease-financing agreement” means a lease-purchase agreement that secures or is related to financing instruments of the lessor, including revenue bonds or certificates of participation;

“lease-purchase agreement” means a lease that

transfers ownership of the property to the lessee by the end of the lease term;

contains a purchase option at a price less than the fair market value of the property on the date the option is exercisable;

has a term, at inception, equal to 75 percent or more of the economic life of the property; or

contains minimum lease payments, including minimum lease payments during a renewal provided for in the agreement, whose present value at the inception of the agreement equals 90 percent or more of the fair market value at the inception of the agreement of the real property that is the subject of the agreement; the present value shall be determined by using as a discount rate the most recent Bond Buyer 20-Bond G.O. Index;

“person” means a business, individual, union, committee, club, other organization, or group of individuals;

“preconstruction services” means information, research, advice, and related tasks regarding the impacts of design on the physical construction of a project; “preconstruction services” does not mean architectural, engineering, or land surveying services;

“procurement” means buying, purchasing, renting, leasing, or otherwise acquiring supplies, equipment for the state fleet, services, or construction; it also includes functions that pertain to the obtaining of a supply, equipment for the state fleet, service, or construction, including description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of contract, and all phases of contract administration;

“procurement officer” means a person authorized to enter into and administer contracts for an agency and make written determinations with respect to them; it also includes an authorized representative of a procurement officer acting within the limits of authority;

“professional services” means professional, technical, or consultant’s services that are predominantly intellectual in character, result in the production of a report or the completion of a task, and include analysis, evaluation, prediction, planning, or recommendation;

“public building” means improved real property leased to the state for governmental, public, or educational use, but does not include improved real property owned by the University of Alaska Heating Corporation and leased to the University of Alaska for a purpose within the scope, as of July 1, 1986, of the heating corporation’s charter;

“services” means the furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a contractor, not involving the delivery of a specific end product other than reports that are merely incidental to the required performance; it does not include employment agreements or collective bargaining agreements;

“state money” means any money appropriated to an agency or spent by an agency irrespective of its source, including federal assistance except as otherwise specified in AS

36.30.890

, but does not include money held in trust by an agency for a person;

“state official” means a public employee, public officer, or official of an agency;

“supplies” means all property of an agency, including equipment, materials, and insurance; it includes privately owned real property leased for the use of agencies, such as office space, but does not include the acquisition or disposition of other interests in land;

“written” means the product of forming characters on paper, other materials, or viewable screens, that can be read, retrieved, and reproduced, including information that is electronically transmitted and stored.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 10 ch 30 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 181 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 10 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1992; am § 114 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1995; am § 45 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 35 SLA 1999; am § 15 ch 144 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 55 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 19 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 115 SLA 2010; am § 10 ch 7 SLA 2011; am § 23 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs in this section were renumbered in 1989, 1990, 1996, 1999, 2003, 2013, and 2021 to retain alphabetical order.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 15, 2021, added (28) [now (19)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 22, SLA 2021 (HB 160), which added paragraph (19) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 493 — 494.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The State Procurement Code does not apply to contracts for the administration of insurance license tests by the Division of Insurance, where the division does not pay any money to the testing service.
Instead, all test fees are paid by the applicants directly to the testing service, and therefore, these fees paid do not fit within the definition of state money.
Aug. 13, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.30.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the State Procurement Code.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)